Washington statutes.
RCW 15.60.005

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter:

(1) "Department" means the department of agriculture of the state of Washington.

(2) "Director" means the director of the state department of agriculture or the director's authorized representative.

(3) "Apiary" means a site where hives of bees or hives are kept or found.

(4) "Apiarist" means any person who owns bees or is a keeper of bees in Washington.

(5) "Bees" means adult insects, eggs, larvae, pupae, or other immature stages of the species Apis mellifera.

(6) "Colony" refers to a natural group of bees having a queen or queens.

(7) "Hive" means a manufactured receptacle or container prepared for the use of bees, that includes movable frames, combs, and substances deposited into the hive by bees.

(8) "Person" means a natural person, individual, firm, partnership, company, society, association, corporation or every officer, agent, or employee of one of these entities.

(9) "Broker" means a person who is engaged in pollinating agricultural crops for a fee using hives that are owned by another person.

[ 2000 c 100 s 1; 1994 c 178 s 1; 1993 c 89 s 1; 1988 c 4 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 362 s 1; 1961 c 11 s 15.60.005. Prior: 1955 c 271 s 1.]